fi: Skannerin ominaisuudet: Tekoälyllä toimiva; Automaattinen asiakirjansyöttölaite (ADF); Automaattinen kuvanparannus; Sisäänrakennettu näyttö; Kaksipuolinen skannaus; Monisivuinen skannaus; Negatiivien skannaus; OCR-tuki; Skannaa pilveen; Muu
da: Scanningsfunktioner: AI-drevet; Automatisk dokumentføder (ADF); Automatisk billedforbedring; Indbygget display; Dupleksscanning; Flersidet scanning; Negativ scanning; OCR-support; Scan til skyen; Andet
pt-PT: Características do leitor: Alimentado por IA; Alimentador automático de documentos (ADF); Melhoramento de imagem automático; Ecrã integrado; Digitalização duplex; Digitalização de várias páginas; Digitalização negativa; Suporte OCR; Digitalizar para nuvem; Outro
nb: Skannerfunksjoner: KI-drevet; Automatisk dokumentmater (ADF); Automatisk bildeforbedring; Innebygd display; Tosidig skanning; Flersidig skanning; Negativ skanning; OCR-støtte; Skann til skyen; Annet
nl: Kenmerken scanner: AI-aangedreven; Automatische documentinvoer (ADF); Automatische beeldverbetering; Ingebouwd display; Dubbelzijdig scannen; Scannen van meerdere pagina's; Negatief scannen; OCR-ondersteuning; Scannen naar de cloud; Andere
sk-SK: Funkcie skenera: Podporovaný umelou inteligenciou; Automatický podávač dokumentov (ADF); Automatické vylepšenie obrazu; Vstavaný displej; Obojstranné skenovanie; Viacstranové skenovanie; Negatívne skenovanie; Podpora OCR; Skenovanie do cloudu; Iné
vi: Tính năng máy quét: Hỗ trợ bởi AI; Khay nạp giấy tự động (ADF); Tự động cải thiện hình ảnh; Có màn hình; Quét hai mặt; Quét nhiều trang; Quét âm bản; Hỗ trợ nhận dạng ký tự quang học; Quét vào đám mây; Khác
zh-CN: 扫描仪功能: AI 赋能; 自动文档送纸器; 自动图像增强; 内置显示; 双面扫描; 多页扫描; 负片扫描; 支持 OCR; 扫描至云端; 其他
el: Χαρακτηριστικά σαρωτή: Με τεχνολογία ΑΙ; Αυτόματος τροφοδότης εγγράφων (ADF); Αυτόματη βελτίωση εικόνας; Ενσωματωμένη οθόνη; Σάρωση διπλής όψης; Σάρωση πολλών σελίδων; Σάρωση αρνητικών; Υποστήριξη OCR; Σάρωση στο Cloud; Άλλο
it: Funzionalità dello scanner: Alimentato dall'intelligenza artificiale; Alimentatore automatico di documenti (ADF); Miglioramento automatico dell'immagine; Display incorporato; Scansione fronte-retro; Scansione di più pagine; Scansione negativa; Supporto OCR; Scansione su cloud; Altro
pl: Charakterystyka skanera: Obsługiwany przez sztuczną inteligencję; Automatyczny podajnik dokumentów; Automatyczne poprawianie obrazu; Wbudowany wyświetlacz; Skanowanie dwustronne; Skanowanie wielu stron; Skanowanie negatywów; Obsługa OCR; Skanowanie do chmury; Inne
tr: Tarayıcı özellikleri: Yapay zeka destekli; Otomatik doküman besleyicisi (ADF); Otomatik görüntü iyileştirme; Dahili ekran; Çift taraflı tarama; Çok sayfalı tarama; Negatif tarama; OCR desteği; Buluta Tara; Diğer
hr-HR: Značajke skenera: Pokreće umjetna inteligencija; Automatski ulagač dokumenata (ADF); Automatsko poboljšanje slike; Ugrađeni zaslon; Obostrano skeniranje; Skeniranje više stranica; Negativno skeniranje; Podrška za HDR; Skeniranje u oblak; Ostalo
lt-LT: Skaitytuvo ypatybės: Veikia DI pagrindu; Automatinis dokumentų padaviklis (ADF); Automatinis vaizdo tobulinimas; Integruotas ekranas; Dvipusis skenavimas; Kelių puslapių skenavimas; Negatyvų skenavimas; OCR palaikymas; Skenavimas į debesį; Kita
ro-RO: Caracteristicile scanerului: Pe bază de AI; Alimentator automat de documente (ADF); Îmbunătățirea automată a imaginii; Afișaj integrat; Scanare duplex; Scanare mai multe pagini; Scanare negativă; Suport OCR; Scanare în cloud; Altele
hu: Szkenner jellemzői: AI-alapú; Automata adagoló (ADF); Automatikus képjavítás; Beépített kijelző; Duplex szkennelés; Többoldalas szkennelés; Negatív szkennelés; OCR-támogatás; Szkennelés a felhőbe; Egyéb
fr: Fonctionnalités du scanner: Doté d’une IA; Chargeur automatique de documents; Amélioration automatique de l’image; Affichage intégré; Numérisation recto verso; Numérisation de plusieurs pages; Numérisation négative; Support OCR; Numériser vers le cloud; Autre
cs: Vlastnosti skeneru: S umělou inteligencí; Automatický podavač dokumentů (ADF); Automatické vylepšení obrazu; Vestavěný displej; Oboustranné skenování; Vícestránkové skenování; Skenování negativů; Podpora OCR; Skenování do cloudu; Jiné
pt-BR: Recursos do scanner: Com IA; Alimentador automático de documentos (ADF); Aprimoramento automático de imagem; Visor integrado; Digitalização duplex; Digitalização de várias páginas; Digitalização negativa; Suporte OCR; Digitalizar para nuvem; Outro
zh-TW: 掃描器功能: AI 驅動; 自動送稿機 (ADF); 自動修圖; 內建顯示器; 雙面掃描; 多頁掃描; 負片掃描; 支援 OCR; 掃描至雲端; 其他
es: Características del escáner: Con tecnología de IA; Alimentador automático de documentos (ADF); Mejora automática de imágenes; Pantalla incorporada; Escaneo dúplex; Escaneo de múltiples páginas; Escaneo negativo; Compatibilidad con OCR; Escaneo a la nube; Otros
bg-BG: Функции на скенера: Задвижван от AI; Автоматично подаващо устройство за документи (ADF); Автоматично подобряване на изображението; Вграден дисплей; Двустранно сканиране; Сканиране на няколко страници; Сканиране на негативи; Поддръжка на OCR; Сканиране в облак; Други
th: คุณลักษณะของสแกนเนอร์: ขับเคลื่อนด้วย AI; ตัวป้อนเอกสารอัตโนมัติ (ADF); การปรับปรุงภาพอัตโนมัติ; มีจอแสดงผลในตัว; การสแกนสองหน้า; การสแกนหลายหน้า; การสแกนแบบเนกาทีฟ; รองรับ OCR; สแกนไปยังคลาวด์; อื่นๆ
sl-SI: Funkcije optičnega bralnika: Poganja UI; Samodejni podajalnik dokumentov (ADF); Samodejna izboljšava slike; Vgrajen zaslon; Obojestransko skeniranje; Večstransko skeniranje; Negativno skeniranje; Podpora OCR; Skeniraj v oblak; Drugo
en: Scanner features: AI-powered; Automatic document feeder (ADF); Automatic image enhancement; Built-in display; Duplex scanning; Multi-page scanning; Negative scanning; OCR support; Scan to Cloud; Other
de: Scannerfunktionen: KI-gestützt; Automatischer Dokumenteneinzug (ADF); Automatische Bildverbesserung; Integriertes Display; Duplex-Scannen; Mehrseitiges Scannen; Negativscannen; OCR-Unterstützung; In die Cloud scannen; Sonstiges
ja: スキャナの機能: AI搭載; 自動原稿送り装置 (ADF); 自動画像補正; ディスプレイ内蔵; 両面スキャン; 複数ページのスキャン; ネガのスキャン; OCRサポート; スキャンしてクラウドへ; その他
ko: 스캐너 기능: AI 기반; 자동 문서 공급기; 자동 이미지 향상; 내장 디스플레이; 양면 스캔; 다중 페이지 스캐닝; 네거티브 스캐닝; OCR 지원; 클라우드로 스캔; 기타
sv: Detaljer för skanner: AI-driven; Automatisk dokumentmatare; Automatisk bildförbättring; Inbyggd display; Duplex skanning; Flersidig skanning; Negativ skanning; OCR-stöd; Scan to Cloud; Övrigt
ru: Характеристики сканера: На базе ИИ; Устройство автоматической подачи документов (АПД); Автоматическое улучшение изображения; Встроенный дисплей; Двустороннее сканирование; Многостраничное сканирование; Сканирование негативов; Поддержка OCR; Сканирование в облако; Другое